Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2182.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13.8(a)(1) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended to read:Section 13.8. Drug Overdose Medication.--(a) The department, in carrying out its duties under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 1023 (relating to personnel), shall have the following duties:(1) Amend the prehospital practitioner scope of practice of emergency medical services providers to include the administration of an opioid antagonist, including naloxone and 12345678910111213141516171819202122 nalmefene.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2182PN2836 - 2 - 123